California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) A statement informing the licensee that a pending suspension will be posted to the license record for not more than 45 days prior to the posting of any license suspension periods required under this article.

(3) The procedures required to reinstate the license.

(c) Reinstatement may be made at any time following the suspension by showing proof of compliance as specified in Sections 7125 and 7125.1.

(d) In addition, with respect to an unlicensed individual acting in the capacity of a contractor who is not otherwise exempted from the provisions of this chapter, a citation may be issued by the registrar under Section 7028.7 for failure to comply with this article and to maintain workers’ compensation insurance. An opportunity for a hearing as specified in Section 7028.10 will be granted if requested within 15 working days after service of the citation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 311, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7125.3.

A contractor shall be considered duly licensed during all periods in which the registrar is required to accept the certificate prescribed by Section 7125, provided the licensee has otherwise complied with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 311, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7125.4.

(a) The filing of the exemption certificate prescribed by this article that is false, or the employment of a person subject to coverage under the workers’ compensation laws after the filing of an exemption certificate without first filing a Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance in accordance with the provisions of this article, or the employment of a person subject to coverage under the workers’ compensation laws without maintaining coverage for that person, constitutes cause for disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, the following civil penalties:

(1) A minimum civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation for any sole owner licensee found to have employed workers without maintaining workers’
 compensation coverage.

(2) A minimum civil penalty of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per violation for any partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or tribal business licensee found to have employed workers without maintaining workers’ compensation coverage.

(3) Additional civil penalties for any subsequent violations, not to exceed a total of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per occurrence.

(b) Any qualifier for a license who, under Section 7068.1, is responsible for assuring that a licensee complies with the provisions of this chapter is also guilty of a misdemeanor for committing or failing to prevent the commission of any of the acts that are cause for disciplinary action under this section.

(c) The board shall not renew or reinstate
 a license in violation of this section until the applicant or licensee provides the board with a current and valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance in the applicant’s or licensee’s business name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 455, Sec. 3.   (SB 291)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7125.5.

(a) At the time of renewal, all active licensees with an exemption for workers’ compensation insurance on file with the board, submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7125, shall either recertify the licensee’s exemption by completing a recertification statement on the license renewal form, as provided by the board, or shall provide a current and valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certificate of Self-Insurance, whichever is applicable.

(b) The license shall not be renewed unless a licensee with an exemption for workers’ compensation insurance on file with the board recertifies the exemption status or provides a current and valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation
 Insurance or Certificate of Self-Insurance in conjunction with the license renewal.

(c) If the documentation required by subdivision (a) is not provided with the license renewal but is received within 30 days after notification by the board of the renewal rejection, the registrar shall grant a retroactive renewal pursuant to Section 7141.5 back to the date of the postmark of the otherwise acceptable renewal. A renewal that is still incomplete for any reason after 30 days after notification of rejection shall not be eligible for retroactive renewal under this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 546, Sec. 1.   (AB 397)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7125.6.

(a) (1) At the time of renewal, all active licensees who have on file a current and valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance, or who are required to provide those certificates pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 7125, shall certify on the license renewal form for the three workers’ compensation classification codes for which the highest estimated payroll is reported on the policy. If the licensee has fewer than three classification codes reported on the policy, the licensee shall provide every classification code reported on the policy.

(2) The board shall not be required to verify or investigate the accuracy
 of the licensee’s classification code or codes provided by the licensee pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The board shall not be held liable for any classification code or codes misreported by a licensee.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a license shall not be renewed unless the licensee complies with this section.

(2) If the documentation and information required by subdivision (a) is not provided with the license renewal form but is received within 30 days after notification by the board of the renewal rejection, the registrar shall grant a retroactive renewal pursuant to Section 7141.5 back to the date of the postmark of the otherwise acceptable renewal. A renewal that is still incomplete
 for any reason more than 30 days after notification of rejection shall not be eligible for retroactive renewal under this subdivision.

(c) When the board updates the public license detail on its internet website for an active renewal submitted by a licensee pursuant to this section, the update shall include the classification code or codes certified by the licensee pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 10.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7125.7.

(a) By no later than January 1, 2027, the board shall establish a process and procedure, which shall include an audit, proof, or other means to obtain evidence to verify that an applicant or licensee without an employee or employees is eligible for exemption from the workers’ compensation insurance requirement pursuant to Section 7125. The board shall report its proposed verification process to the Legislature no later than January 1, 2027.

(b) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall
 be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 455, Sec. 4.   (SB 291)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7126.

(a) Any licensee or agent or officer thereof, who violates, or omits to comply with, any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any person not licensed in accordance with this chapter who is acting as a contractor and who violates, or omits to comply with, Section
 3700 of the Labor Code is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Prosecution of any offense under this section shall be commenced within two years after commission of the offense as provided in Section 802 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 323, Sec. 1.   (AB 2705)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7127.

(a) (1) If an employer subject to licensure under this chapter has failed to secure the payment of compensation as required by Section 3700 of the Labor Code, and whether that employer is or is not licensed under this chapter, the registrar may, in addition to any other administrative remedy, issue and serve on that employer a stop order prohibiting the use of employee labor. The stop order shall become effective immediately upon service. An employee affected by the work stoppage shall be paid by the employer for his or her time lost, not exceeding 10 days, pending compliance by the employer.

(2) Failure of any employer, officer, or any person having direction, management, or control
 of any place of employment or of employees to observe a stop order issued and served upon him or her pursuant to this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding 60 days or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

(b) An employer who is subject to this section may protest the stop order by making and filing with the registrar a written request for a hearing within 20 days after service of the stop order. The hearing shall be held within five days from the date of filing the request. The registrar shall notify the employer of the time and place of the hearing by mail. At the conclusion of the hearing, the stop order shall be immediately affirmed or dismissed, and within 24 hours thereafter the registrar shall issue and serve on all parties to the hearing by registered or certified mail a written notice of findings and findings. A writ of mandate may be taken from the findings to
 the appropriate superior court. Such writ must be taken within 45 days after the mailing of the notice of findings and findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 643, Sec. 1.   (SB 1254)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Revenue [7135. - 7138.1.]

7135.

(a) The fees and civil penalties received under this chapter shall be deposited in the Contractors License Fund. All moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the board shall use moneys appropriated from the fund to improve its administrative and investigative oversight activities and capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 64.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7135.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, each fiscal year the board shall designate, if appropriated in the Budget Act and to the extent that it does not conflict with the control language of the Budget Act, no less than 20 percent of the annual amount collected as a result of the fees increased by statutes enacted during the 1993 portion of the 1993–94 Regular Session to be used to enforce the provision of this chapter relative to unlicensed activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1188, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7136.

The director shall designate a sum not to exceed 10 percent of the total income of the Contractors State License Board for each fiscal year to be transferred to the Consumer Affairs Fund as the board’s share of the cost of administration of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 65.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7137.

(a) The board may set fees by regulation. These fees shall be set according to the following schedule:

(1) Application fees shall be set as follows:

(A) The application fee for an original license in a single classification shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450) and may be increased to not more than five hundred sixty-three dollars ($563).

(B) The application fee for each additional classification applied for in connection with an original license shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and may be increased to not more than one hundred eighty-eight dollars
 ($188).

(C) The application fee for each additional classification pursuant to Section 7059 shall be two hundred thirty dollars ($230) and may be increased to not more than two hundred eighty-eight dollars ($288).

(D) The application fee to replace a responsible managing officer, responsible managing manager, responsible managing member, or responsible managing employee pursuant to Section 7068.2 shall be two hundred thirty dollars ($230) and may be increased to not more than two hundred eighty-eight dollars ($288).

(E) The application fee to add personnel, other than a qualifying individual, to an existing license shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) and may be increased to not more than one hundred fifty-seven
 dollars ($157).

(F) The application fee for an asbestos certification shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) and may be increased to not more than one hundred fifty-seven dollars ($157).

(G) The application fee for a hazardous substance removal or remedial action certification shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) and may be increased to not more than one hundred fifty-seven dollars ($157).

(2) The fee to take an examination conducted or administered by a public or private organization pursuant to Section 7065 shall be no greater than the actual cost of the administration of the examination and shall be paid directly to the organization by the applicant.

(3) Initial license and registration fees shall be set as follows:

(A) The initial license fee for an active or inactive license for an individual owner shall be two hundred dollars ($200) and may be increased to not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(B) The initial license fee for an active or inactive license for a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or joint venture shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and may be increased to not more than four hundred thirty-eight dollars ($438).

(C) The registration fee for a home improvement salesperson shall be two hundred dollars ($200) and may be increased to not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(D) (i) The board shall grant a 50-percent reduction in the fees prescribed by this paragraph to an applicant who is a veteran of the United States Armed Forces, including the National Guard or Reserve components, and was not dishonorably discharged.

(ii) To demonstrate discharge grade at the time of the board’s request for the initial license or registration fee, the applicant shall provide the board a copy of a current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by this state or another state with the word “Veteran” printed on its face or a copy of their DD214 long form.

(4) License and registration renewal fees shall be set as follows:

(A) The renewal fee for an active license for
 an individual owner shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450) and may be increased to not more than five hundred sixty-three dollars ($563).

(B) The renewal fee for an inactive license for an individual owner shall be three hundred dollars ($300) and may be increased to not more than three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375).

(C) The renewal fee for an active license for a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or joint venture shall be seven hundred dollars ($700) and may be increased to not more than eight hundred seventy-five dollars ($875).

(D) The renewal fee for an inactive license for a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or joint venture shall be five hundred dollars ($500) and may be
 increased to not more than six hundred twenty-five dollars ($625).

(E) The renewal fee for a home improvement salesperson registration shall be two hundred dollars ($200) and may be increased to not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(5) The delinquency fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee, if the license is renewed after its expiration.

(6) Miscellaneous fees shall be set as follows:

(A) In addition to any other fees charged to C-10 contractors, the board shall charge a fee of twenty dollars ($20), to be assessed with the renewal fee for an active license, which shall be used by the board to enforce provisions of the Labor Code related to
 electrician certification.

(B) The board shall require a licensee that is subject to a public complaint requiring a professional or expert investigation or inspection and report pursuant to Section 7019 to pay those reasonable fees that are necessary to cover the costs of that investigation or inspection and report, in accordance with the following provisions:

(i) Fees shall be fixed in an amount not more than the board’s cost of contracting for the investigation or inspection and report, except that the minimum fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for each investigation or inspection and report and may be increased to not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each investigation or inspection and report.

(ii) The fee shall only be assessed for an investigation or inspection and report that resulted in issuance of a letter of admonishment or a citation pursuant to Sections 7099 and 7099.9 that has become a final order of the registrar.

(iii) A license shall not be renewed without payment of the renewal fee and all fees for the investigation or inspection and report pursuant to this subparagraph.

(C) The service fee to deposit with the registrar lawful money or cashier’s check pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure for purposes of compliance with any provision of Article 5 (commencing with Section 7065) shall be one hundred dollars ($100), which shall be used by the board only to process each deposit filed with the registrar,
 to cover the reasonable costs to the registrar for holding money or cashier’s checks in trust in interest bearing deposit or share accounts, and to offset the costs of processing payment of lawful claims against a deposit in a civil action.

(D) The fee for the processing and issuance of a duplicate copy of any certificate of licensure or other form evidencing licensure or renewal of licensure pursuant to Section 122 shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(E) The fee to change the business name of a license as it is recorded under this chapter shall be one hundred dollars ($100) and may be increased to not more than one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(F) The service charge for a dishonored check authorized by Section
 6157 of the Government Code shall be twenty-five dollars ($25) for each check.

(b) The board shall, by regulation, establish criteria for the approval of expedited processing of applications. Approved expedited processing of applications for licensure or registration, as required by other provisions of law, shall not be subject to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 19.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7137.5.

The sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be transferred from the Contractors License Fund to the Controller for the exclusive use of the California Uniform Construction Cost Accounting Commission.

The commission shall prepare a recommendation to the Legislature for a local public agency source to fund the commission beginning July 1, 1991, which will provide revenue supported by the contract activities represented by the commission’s authority.

Upon adoption of this funding program, the commission shall reimburse the Contractors License Fund in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 67.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7138.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a fee paid in connection with a service or application covered by Section 7137 shall accrue to the Contractors License Fund as an earned fee and shall not be refunded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 68.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7138.1.

Notwithstanding Section 7137, the board shall fix fees to be collected pursuant to that section in order to generate revenues sufficient to maintain the board’s reserve fund at a level not to exceed approximately 12 months of annual authorized board expenditures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 233, Sec. 5.   (SB 779)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. The Construction Management Education Sponsorship Act of 1991 [7139. - 7139.10.]

7139.

This article shall be known as the Construction Management Education Sponsorship Act of 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1158, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7139.1.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) There is a demand and increasing need for construction management education programs and resources within the postsecondary education system that prepare graduates for the management of construction operations and companies regulated by the Contractors State License Law and enforced by the Contractors State License Board.

(b) Although construction management programs do exist within the state university system, these programs are woefully underfunded and insufficiently funded to provide training on state-of-the-art management
 information systems for either graduates or extension programs for continuing education of licensed contractors. Construction industry associations have provided some assistance through direct grants and scholarships, but the industrywide service of these programs and the need for additional assistance mandates broad based industrywide support.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that by enabling contractors to designate a portion of their licensure fee and providing a format for contractors to contribute funds to construction management education, this article will receive broad based industry support. In addition, this article allows the contractor to demonstrate the importance of construction management education. This assistance will enable greater development of construction management curricula and will improve the overall quality of
 construction by providing construction management training to California licensed contractors and their current and future management personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 69.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7139.2.

(a) There is hereby created the Construction Management Education Account (CMEA) as a separate account in the Contractors License Fund for the purposes of construction management education. Funds in the account shall be available for the purposes of this article upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(b) The Contractors State License Board shall allow a contractor to make a contribution to the Construction Management Education Account at the time of the contractor license fee payment. The license fee form shall clearly display this alternative on its face and shall clearly inform the licensee that this provision is a contribution to the
 Construction Management Education Account and is in addition to the fees.

(c) The board may accept grants from federal, state, or local public agencies, or from private foundations or individuals, in order to assist it in carrying out its duties, functions, and powers under this article. Grant moneys shall be deposited into the Construction Management Education Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 70.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7139.3.

(a) The board may award grants to qualified public postsecondary educational institutions for the support of courses of study in construction management. 

(b) Any organization of contractors, or organization of contractor organizations, incorporated under Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Corporations Code may request the board to award grants pursuant to subdivision (a) directly to qualified public postsecondary educational institutions of its choice. However,
 the total amount of money that may be awarded to one public postsecondary educational institution pursuant to subdivision (a) may not exceed an amount equal to 25 percent of the total funds available under this article.

(c) The board shall establish an advisory committee to recommend grant awards. The advisory committee shall be known as the Construction Management Education Account Advisory Committee and shall consist of 11 members, with at least one representative from each of the following: Associated General Contractors of California, Associated Builders and Contractors, California Building Industry Association, National Electrical Contractors Association, Plumbing-Heating-Cooling Contractor’s Association, Southern California Contractor’s Association, Associated General Contractors of San Diego, Engineering and Utility Contractors Association, Engineering Contractors Association, California Sheet Metal and Air Conditioning Contractor’s
 Association, and one member representing the California State University and University of California construction management programs accredited by the American Council for Construction Education. Advisory committee member terms shall be for three years and the representatives shall be appointed by each identified group. Members of the advisory committee shall not receive per diem or reimbursement for traveling and other expenses pursuant to Section 103.

(d) The mission of the Construction Management Education Account Advisory Committee is to maintain, and increase the quality and availability of, education programs for the construction industry. The primary focus is to provide financial resources not now available to accredited construction management programs in California colleges and universities to maintain and upgrade facilities and provide greater access by the industry to modern construction standards and management practices. The
 advisory committee shall do all of the following:

(1) Confirm the qualifications of programs applying for grants.

(2) Award less than full grants when the account has insufficient funds to award full grants to all qualifying programs.

(3) Receive and review year-end reports of use and impact of funds.

(4) Affirm applications for American Council for Construction Education accreditation and, when funds are available, award grants to complete the accreditation process.

(5) Promote close ties between feeder junior colleges and four-year construction management programs.

(6) Support development of new educational programs with
 specific emphasis on outreach to the construction industry at large.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7139.4.

Qualified public postsecondary educational institutions shall provide postsecondary construction management programs at the baccalaureate or higher level that either award or provide one of the following:

(a) A bachelor of science construction management degree accredited by the American Council for Construction Education. 

(b) A degree with an American Council for Construction Education accredited option, including, but not limited to, engineering technology and industrial technology. 

(c) A bachelor of science or higher degree program documenting placement of more than 50 percent of their graduates with California licensed contractors. The placement of a person who holds a master or doctorate degree in the faculty of a construction program shall be counted as though placed with a California licensed contractor. 

(d) The development of a construction management curriculum to meet the American Council for Construction Education criteria.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1158, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7139.5.

Grants shall be made pursuant to this article to public postsecondary educational institutions that meet the qualifications specified in Section 7139.4 in the following amounts:

(a) Three thousand dollars ($3,000) per graduate during the past academic year for institutions qualifying under subdivision (a) of Section 7139.4. 

(b) Three thousand dollars ($3,000) per graduate during the past academic year for institutions qualifying under subdivision (b) of Section 7139.4.

(c) Three thousand dollars ($3,000) per graduate placed with California licensed contractors during the past academic year for institutions qualifying under subdivision (c) of Section 7139.4. These funds shall be used for the purpose of becoming accredited by the American Council for Construction Education and shall be available for up to three years. The board may continue to provide this grant to an institution that in its judgment is meeting the intent of this act and is continuing its development towards accreditation. 

(d) Institutions qualifying under subdivision (d) of Section 7139.4 may receive a grant in an amount up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per year for up to two years. Thereafter, these institutions may receive grants based upon the criteria described in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive. The board may continue to award a grant to an institution that in its judgment is meeting the intent of this article
 and is continuing its development towards accreditation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1158, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7139.6.

(a) The grants issued pursuant to Sections 7139.3 and 7139.5 may be used for all of the following: 

(1) Instructional materials and support, equipment, curriculum development, and delivery. 

(2) Support and development of outreach, continuing education, and cooperative education or internship programs. 

(3) Administrative and clerical support positions. 

(4) Faculty recruitment and
 development, to include support for postgraduate work leading to advanced degrees, visiting lecturer compensation and expenses, teaching assistant positions, and faculty positions. 

(b) Grant moneys may also be used to support general classroom and laboratory operating expenses and related administrative supplies, including, but not limited to, reference materials, testing equipment, and equipment maintenance. The list of support items in this subdivision and subdivision (a) are intended to be descriptive rather than limiting. “Support” does not include faculty salary supplements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1158, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7139.8.

The president of each public postsecondary educational institution receiving a grant under this article shall submit, with its respective request for a grant each year following the initial year for which grants are issued, a report to the board delineating the amount of the past grant awarded from the Construction Management Education Account to that institution and the utilization of those funds. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) The number of graduates placed with the California licensed contractors during the previous academic year. 

(b) The expected enrollment in construction management courses in the upcoming academic year. 

(c) Continuing education and extension courses offered during the previous academic year and their enrollments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1158, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7139.9.

The board may allocate up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per year from the Construction Management Education Account for the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1158, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7139.10.

It is the intent of the Legislature that state funding for the grants authorized to be awarded under this section be provided only from the Contractors’ License Fund to the extent that funds are available in that fund and that no other state funding be provided for those grants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1158, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Renewal of Licenses [7140. - 7145.5.]

7140.

All licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter shall expire two years from the last day of the month in which the license is issued, or two years from the date on which the renewed license last expired.

To renew a license which has not expired, the licensee shall, before the time at which the license would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the registrar and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal of an unexpired license shall continue the license in effect for the two-year period following the expiration date of the license, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1160, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

7141.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a license that has expired may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration by filing an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the registrar and payment of the appropriate renewal fee. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date an acceptable renewal application is filed with the board. The licensee shall be considered unlicensed and there will be a break in the licensing time between the expiration date and the date the renewal becomes effective. Except as provided in subdivision (b), if the license is renewed after the expiration date, the licensee shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter.

(b) An incomplete renewal application that had originally been submitted on or before the license expiration date shall be returned to the licensee by the registrar with an explanation of the reasons for its rejection. If a corrected and acceptable renewal application is not returned within 30 days after the license expiration date, the delinquency fee shall apply. The 30 day grace period shall apply only to the delinquency fee. The license shall reflect an expired status for any period between the expiration date and the date of submission of a correct and acceptable renewal application.

(c) If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 7140 that next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(d) If a license is not renewed within five years, the licensee shall make an application for a license pursuant to Section 7066.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 319, Sec. 9.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7141.5.

The registrar shall grant the retroactive renewal of a license if, within 90 days of the expiration of the license, the otherwise eligible licensee submits a completed application for renewal on a form prescribed by the registrar, and pays the appropriate renewal fee and delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. For the purposes of this section, an application shall be deemed submitted if it is delivered to the board’s headquarters or postmarked within 90 days of the expiration of the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 71.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7143.

A license that is suspended for any reason which constitutes a basis for suspension under this chapter, is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this chapter, but this renewal does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended, and until it is reinstated, to engage in any activity to which the license relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 363, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7143.5.

A person who, by reason of the provisions of Section 7141, is not entitled to renew his license, may apply for and obtain a new license only if he pays all of the fees and meets all of the qualifications and requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining an original license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1138.)
-------------------------------------------

7144.

A revoked license shall be considered as having expired as of the date of revocation and shall not be renewed. To reinstate a revoked license a licensee may apply for reinstatement of the license only if he pays all of the fees and meets all of the qualifications and requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining an original license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 433.)
-------------------------------------------

7145.

The registrar may refuse to renew a license for the failure or refusal by the licensee to complete the renewal application prescribed by the registrar. If a licensee fails to return an application for renewal which was rejected for insufficiency or incompleteness within 90 days from the original date of rejection, the application and fee shall be deemed abandoned. Any application abandoned may not be reinstated. However, the applicant may file another application accompanied by the required fee.

The registrar may review and accept the petition of a licensee who disputes the invalidation of his or her application for renewal upon a showing of good cause. This petition shall be received within 90 days from the date the renewal application is deemed abandoned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1174, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7145.5.

(a) The registrar may refuse to issue, reinstate, reactivate, or renew a license or may suspend a license for the failure of a licensee to resolve all outstanding final liabilities, which include taxes, additions to tax, penalties, interest, and any fees that may be assessed by the board, the Department of Industrial Relations, the Employment Development Department, the Franchise Tax Board, or the State Board of Equalization.

(1) Until the debts covered by this section are satisfied, the qualifying person and any other personnel of record named on a license that has been suspended under this section shall be prohibited from serving in any capacity that is subject to licensure under
 this chapter, but shall be permitted to act in the capacity of a nonsupervising bona fide employee.

(2) The license of any other renewable licensed entity with any of the same personnel of record that have been assessed an outstanding liability covered by this section shall be suspended until the debt has been satisfied or until the same personnel of record disassociate themselves from the renewable licensed entity.

(b) The refusal to issue a license or the suspension of a license as provided by this section shall be applicable only if the registrar has mailed a notice preliminary to the refusal or suspension that indicates that the license will be refused or suspended by a date certain. This preliminary notice shall be mailed to the licensee at least 60 days before the date
 certain.
